North Carolina statutes. Chapter 7A. Judicial Department.
Article 24B. Termination of Parental Rights. [Repealed]

§§ 7A-289.22,
7A-289.23.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1998-202, s. 5.

Cross References.

As to termination of parental rights under the Juvenile Code, effective July 1, 1999, see now

G.S. 7B-1100

et seq.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment, “The Implications of In re L.M.T.: A Call to the North Carolina General Assembly to Reinstate Procedural Safeguards, a Parent’s Right to Appeal, and the Importance of a Permanency Planning Order,” see 38 Campbell L. Rev. 241 (2016).

§ 7A-289.23A.

Recodified as § 7B-1102.

§§ 7A-289.24 through 7A-289.35.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1998-202, s. 5.